Utah statutes.
41-6a-516.   Admissibility of chemical test results in actions for driving
under the influence -- Weight of evidence.
(1) (a)  In any civil or criminal action or proceeding in which it is material
to prove that a person was operating or in actual physical control of a
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs or with a blood or
breath alcohol content statutorily prohibited, the results of a chemical test
or tests as authorized in Section 41-6a-520 are admissible as evidence.
(b) (i)  In a criminal proceeding, noncompliance with Section 41-6a-520 does
not render the results of a chemical test inadmissible.
(ii)  Evidence of a defendant's blood or breath alcohol content or drug
content is admissible except when prohibited by Rules of Evidence or the
constitution.
(2)  This section does not prevent a court from receiving otherwise admissible
evidence as to a defendant's blood or breath alcohol level or drug level at
the time relevant to the alleged offense.
